src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/N-laatyng_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:


# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.
# 20230502 Csilla

  Noun - ла̄тыӈ: # "(eng) language/(hun) nyelv/(rus) язык" - full paradigm

     ла̄тыӈ+N+Sg+Nom: ла̄тыӈ
     ла̄тыӈ+N+Sg+Loc: ла̄тыӈт
     ла̄тыӈ+N+Sg+Lat: ла̄тыӈн
     ла̄тыӈ+N+Sg+Abl: ла̄тыӈныл
     ла̄тыӈ+N+Sg+Ins: ла̄тӈыл
     ла̄тыӈ+N+Sg+Tra: ла̄тӈыг

     ла̄тыӈ+N+Du+Nom: ла̄тӈыг
     ла̄тыӈ+N+Du+Loc: ла̄тӈыгт
     ла̄тыӈ+N+Du+Lat: ла̄тӈыгн
     ла̄тыӈ+N+Du+Abl: ла̄тӈыгныл
     ла̄тыӈ+N+Du+Ins: ла̄тӈыгтыл

     ла̄тыӈ+N+Pl+Nom: ла̄тӈыт
     ла̄тыӈ+N+Pl+Loc: [ла̄тӈытт, ла̄тӈытыт]
     ла̄тыӈ+N+Pl+Lat: [ла̄тӈытн, ла̄тӈытын]
     ла̄тыӈ+N+Pl+Abl: ла̄тӈытныл
     ла̄тыӈ+N+Pl+Ins: ла̄тӈытыл

     ла̄тыӈ+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg1: ла̄тӈум
     ла̄тыӈ+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg1: ла̄тӈумт
     ла̄тыӈ+N+Sg+Lat+PxSg1: ла̄тӈумн
     ла̄тыӈ+N+Sg+Abl+PxSg1: ла̄тӈумныл
     ла̄тыӈ+N+Sg+Ins+PxSg1: ла̄тӈумтыл
     ла̄тыӈ+N+Sg+Tra+PxSg1: ла̄тӈумыг

     ла̄тыӈ+N+Du+Nom+PxSg1: ла̄тӈагум
     ла̄тыӈ+N+Du+Loc+PxSg1: ла̄тӈагумт
     ла̄тыӈ+N+Du+Lat+PxSg1: ла̄тӈагумн
     ла̄тыӈ+N+Du+Abl+PxSg1: ла̄тӈагумныл
     ла̄тыӈ+N+Du+Ins+PxSg1: ла̄тӈагумтыл

     ла̄тыӈ+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg1: ла̄тӈанум
     ла̄тыӈ+N+Pl+Loc+PxSg1: ла̄тӈанумт
     ла̄тыӈ+N+Pl+Lat+PxSg1: ла̄тӈанумн
     ла̄тыӈ+N+Pl+Abl+PxSg1: ла̄тӈанумныл
     ла̄тыӈ+N+Pl+Ins+PxSg1: ла̄тӈанумтыл

     ла̄тыӈ+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg2: ла̄тӈын
     ла̄тыӈ+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg2: ла̄тӈынт
     ла̄тыӈ+N+Sg+Lat+PxSg2: ла̄тӈынн
     ла̄тыӈ+N+Sg+Abl+PxSg2: ла̄тӈынныл
     ла̄тыӈ+N+Sg+Ins+PxSg2: ла̄тӈынтыл
     ла̄тыӈ+N+Sg+Tra+PxSg2: ла̄тӈыныг

     ла̄тыӈ+N+Du+Nom+PxSg2: [ла̄тӈагын, ла̄тӈагн]
     ла̄тыӈ+N+Du+Loc+PxSg2: ла̄тӈагынт
     ла̄тыӈ+N+Du+Lat+PxSg2: ла̄тӈагынн
     ла̄тыӈ+N+Du+Abl+PxSg2: ла̄тӈагынныл
     ла̄тыӈ+N+Du+Ins+PxSg2: ла̄тӈагынтыл

     ла̄тыӈ+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg2: [ла̄тӈанын, ла̄тӈан]
     ла̄тыӈ+N+Pl+Loc+PxSg2: [ла̄тӈанынт, ла̄тӈант]
     ла̄тыӈ+N+Pl+Lat+PxSg2: [ла̄тӈанынн, ла̄тӈанн]
     ла̄тыӈ+N+Pl+Abl+PxSg2: [ла̄тӈанынныл, ла̄тӈанныл]
     ла̄тыӈ+N+Pl+Ins+PxSg2: [ла̄тӈанынтыл, ла̄тӈантыл]

     ла̄тыӈ+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg3: ла̄тӈе
     ла̄тыӈ+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg3: [ла̄тӈе̄т, ла̄тӈет]
     ла̄тыӈ+N+Sg+Lat+PxSg3: [ла̄тӈе̄н, ла̄тӈен]
     ла̄тыӈ+N+Sg+Abl+PxSg3: [ла̄тӈе̄ныл, ла̄тӈеныл]
     ла̄тыӈ+N+Sg+Ins+PxSg3: [ла̄тӈе̄нтыл, ла̄тӈентыл]
     ла̄тыӈ+N+Sg+Tra+PxSg3: [ла̄тӈе̄г, ла̄тӈег]

     ла̄тыӈ+N+Du+Nom+PxSg3: ла̄тӈаге
     ла̄тыӈ+N+Du+Loc+PxSg3: [ла̄тӈаге̄т, ла̄тӈагет]
     ла̄тыӈ+N+Du+Lat+PxSg3: [ла̄тӈаге̄н, ла̄тӈаген]
     ла̄тыӈ+N+Du+Abl+PxSg3: [ла̄тӈаге̄ныл, ла̄тӈагеныл]
     ла̄тыӈ+N+Du+Ins+PxSg3: [ла̄тӈаге̄тыл, ла̄тӈагетыл]

     ла̄тыӈ+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg3: ла̄тӈанэ
     ла̄тыӈ+N+Pl+Loc+PxSg3: [ла̄тӈанэ̄т, ла̄тӈанэт]
     ла̄тыӈ+N+Pl+Lat+PxSg3: [ла̄тӈанэ̄н, ла̄тӈанэн]
     ла̄тыӈ+N+Pl+Abl+PxSg3: [ла̄тӈанэ̄ныл, ла̄тӈанэныл]
     ла̄тыӈ+N+Pl+Ins+PxSg3: [ла̄тӈанэ̄тыл, ла̄тӈанэтыл]

     ла̄тыӈ+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu1: [ла̄тӈаме̄н, ла̄тӈамен]
     ла̄тыӈ+N+Sg+Loc+PxDu1: [ла̄тӈаме̄нт, ла̄тӈамент]
     ла̄тыӈ+N+Sg+Lat+PxDu1: [ла̄тӈаме̄нн, ла̄тӈаменн]
     ла̄тыӈ+N+Sg+Abl+PxDu1: [ла̄тӈаме̄нныл, ла̄тӈаменныл]
     ла̄тыӈ+N+Sg+Ins+PxDu1: [ла̄тӈаме̄нтыл, ла̄тӈаментыл]

     ла̄тыӈ+N+Du+Nom+PxDu1: [ла̄тӈагаме̄н, ла̄тӈагамен, ла̄тӈагмен]
     ла̄тыӈ+N+Du+Loc+PxDu1: [ла̄тӈагаме̄нт, ла̄тӈагамент, ла̄тӈагмент]
     ла̄тыӈ+N+Du+Lat+PxDu1: [ла̄тӈагаме̄нн, ла̄тӈагаменн, ла̄тӈагменн]
     ла̄тыӈ+N+Du+Abl+PxDu1: [ла̄тӈагаме̄нныл, ла̄тӈагаменныл, ла̄тӈагменныл]
     ла̄тыӈ+N+Du+Ins+PxDu1: [ла̄тӈагаме̄нтыл, ла̄тӈагаментыл, ла̄тӈагментыл]

     ла̄тыӈ+N+Pl+Nom+PxDu1: [ла̄тӈанаме̄н, ла̄тӈанамен]
     ла̄тыӈ+N+Pl+Loc+PxDu1: [ла̄тӈанаме̄нт, ла̄тӈанамент]
     ла̄тыӈ+N+Pl+Lat+PxDu1: [ла̄тӈанаме̄нн, ла̄тӈанаменн]
     ла̄тыӈ+N+Pl+Abl+PxDu1: [ла̄тӈанаме̄нныл, ла̄тӈанаменныл]
     ла̄тыӈ+N+Pl+Ins+PxDu1: [ла̄тӈанаме̄нтыл, ла̄тӈанаментыл]

     ла̄тыӈ+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu2: [ла̄тӈын, ла̄тӈы̄н]
     ла̄тыӈ+N+Sg+Loc+PxDu2: [ла̄тӈынт, ла̄тӈы̄нт]
     ла̄тыӈ+N+Sg+Lat+PxDu2: [ла̄тӈынн, ла̄тӈы̄нн]
     ла̄тыӈ+N+Sg+Abl+PxDu2: [ла̄тӈынныл, ла̄тӈы̄нныл]
     ла̄тыӈ+N+Sg+Ins+PxDu2: [ла̄тӈынтыл, ла̄тӈы̄нтыл]

     ла̄тыӈ+N+Du+Nom+PxDu2: [ла̄тӈагын, ла̄тӈагы̄н]
     ла̄тыӈ+N+Du+Loc+PxDu2: [ла̄тӈагынт, ла̄тӈагы̄нт]
     ла̄тыӈ+N+Du+Lat+PxDu2: [ла̄тӈагынн, ла̄тӈагы̄нн]
     ла̄тыӈ+N+Du+Abl+PxDu2: [ла̄тӈагынныл, ла̄тӈагы̄нныл]
     ла̄тыӈ+N+Du+Ins+PxDu2: [ла̄тӈагынтыл, ла̄тӈагы̄нтыл]

     ла̄тыӈ+N+Pl+Nom+PxDu2: [ла̄тӈанын, ла̄тӈаны̄н, ла̄тӈан]
     ла̄тыӈ+N+Pl+Loc+PxDu2: [ла̄тӈанынт, ла̄тӈаны̄нт, ла̄тӈант]
     ла̄тыӈ+N+Pl+Lat+PxDu2: [ла̄тӈанынн, ла̄тӈаны̄нн, ла̄тӈанн]
     ла̄тыӈ+N+Pl+Abl+PxDu2: [ла̄тӈанынныл, ла̄тӈаны̄нныл, ла̄тӈанныл]
     ла̄тыӈ+N+Pl+Ins+PxDu2: [ла̄тӈанынтыл, ла̄тӈаны̄нтыл, ла̄тӈантыл]

     ла̄тыӈ+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu3: [ла̄тӈе̄н, ла̄тӈен]
     ла̄тыӈ+N+Sg+Loc+PxDu3: [ла̄тӈе̄нт, ла̄тӈент]
     ла̄тыӈ+N+Sg+Lat+PxDu3: [ла̄тӈе̄нн, ла̄тӈенн]
     ла̄тыӈ+N+Sg+Abl+PxDu3: [ла̄тӈе̄нныл, ла̄тӈенныл]
     ла̄тыӈ+N+Sg+Ins+PxDu3: [ла̄тӈе̄нтыл, ла̄тӈентыл]

     ла̄тыӈ+N+Du+Nom+PxDu3: [ла̄тӈаге̄н, ла̄тӈаген]
     ла̄тыӈ+N+Du+Loc+PxDu3: [ла̄тӈаге̄нт, ла̄тӈагент]
     ла̄тыӈ+N+Du+Lat+PxDu3: [ла̄тӈаге̄нн, ла̄тӈагенн]
     ла̄тыӈ+N+Du+Abl+PxDu3: [ла̄тӈаге̄нныл, ла̄тӈагенныл]
     ла̄тыӈ+N+Du+Ins+PxDu3: [ла̄тӈаге̄нтыл, ла̄тӈагентыл]

     ла̄тыӈ+N+Pl+Nom+PxDu3: [ла̄тӈанэ̄н, ла̄тӈанэн]
     ла̄тыӈ+N+Pl+Loc+PxDu3: [ла̄тӈанэ̄нт, ла̄тӈанэнт]
     ла̄тыӈ+N+Pl+Lat+PxDu3: [ла̄тӈанэ̄нн, ла̄тӈанэнн]
     ла̄тыӈ+N+Pl+Abl+PxDu3: [ла̄тӈанэ̄нныл, ла̄тӈанэнныл]
     ла̄тыӈ+N+Pl+Ins+PxDu3: [ла̄тӈанэ̄нтыл, ла̄тӈанэнтыл]

     ла̄тыӈ+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl1: ла̄тӈув
     ла̄тыӈ+N+Sg+Loc+PxPl1: ла̄тӈувт
     ла̄тыӈ+N+Sg+Lat+PxPl1: ла̄тӈувн
     ла̄тыӈ+N+Sg+Abl+PxPl1: ла̄тӈувныл
     ла̄тыӈ+N+Sg+Ins+PxPl1: ла̄тӈувтыл

     ла̄тыӈ+N+Du+Nom+PxPl1: ла̄тӈагув
     ла̄тыӈ+N+Du+Loc+PxPl1: ла̄тӈагувт
     ла̄тыӈ+N+Du+Lat+PxPl1: ла̄тӈагувн
     ла̄тыӈ+N+Du+Abl+PxPl1: ла̄тӈагувныл
     ла̄тыӈ+N+Du+Ins+PxPl1: ла̄тӈагувтыл

     ла̄тыӈ+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl1: ла̄тӈанув
     ла̄тыӈ+N+Pl+Loc+PxPl1: ла̄тӈанувт
     ла̄тыӈ+N+Pl+Lat+PxPl1: ла̄тӈанувн
     ла̄тыӈ+N+Pl+Abl+PxPl1: ла̄тӈанувныл
     ла̄тыӈ+N+Pl+Ins+PxPl1: ла̄тӈанувтыл

     ла̄тыӈ+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl2: [ла̄тӈын, ла̄тӈы̄н]
     ла̄тыӈ+N+Sg+Loc+PxPl2: [ла̄тӈынт, ла̄тӈынт]
     ла̄тыӈ+N+Sg+Lat+PxPl2: [ла̄тӈынн, ла̄тӈынн]
     ла̄тыӈ+N+Sg+Abl+PxPl2: [ла̄тӈынныл, ла̄тӈынныл]
     ла̄тыӈ+N+Sg+Ins+PxPl2: [ла̄тӈынтыл, ла̄тӈынтыл]

     ла̄тыӈ+N+Du+Nom+PxPl2: [ла̄тӈагын, ла̄тӈагы̄н]
     ла̄тыӈ+N+Du+Loc+PxPl2: [ла̄тӈагынт, ла̄тӈагы̄нт]
     ла̄тыӈ+N+Du+Lat+PxPl2: [ла̄тӈагынн, ла̄тӈагы̄нн]
     ла̄тыӈ+N+Du+Abl+PxPl2: [ла̄тӈагынныл, ла̄тӈагы̄нныл]
     ла̄тыӈ+N+Du+Ins+PxPl2: [ла̄тӈагынтыл, ла̄тӈагы̄нтыл]

     ла̄тыӈ+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl2: [ла̄тӈанын, ла̄тӈаны̄н, ла̄тӈан]
     ла̄тыӈ+N+Pl+Loc+PxPl2: [ла̄тӈанынт, ла̄тӈаны̄нт, ла̄тӈант]
     ла̄тыӈ+N+Pl+Lat+PxPl2: [ла̄тӈанынн, ла̄тӈаны̄нн, ла̄тӈанн]
     ла̄тыӈ+N+Pl+Abl+PxPl2: [ла̄тӈанынныл, ла̄тӈаны̄нныл, ла̄тӈанныл]
     ла̄тыӈ+N+Pl+Ins+PxPl2: [ла̄тӈанынтыл, ла̄тӈаны̄нтыл, ла̄тӈантыл]

     ла̄тыӈ+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl3: ла̄тӈаныл
     ла̄тыӈ+N+Sg+Loc+PxPl3: ла̄тӈанылт
     ла̄тыӈ+N+Sg+Lat+PxPl3: ла̄тӈанылн
     ла̄тыӈ+N+Sg+Abl+PxPl3: ла̄тӈанылныл
     ла̄тыӈ+N+Sg+Ins+PxPl3: ла̄тӈанылтыл

     ла̄тыӈ+N+Du+Nom+PxPl3: ла̄тӈаганыл
     ла̄тыӈ+N+Du+Loc+PxPl3: ла̄тӈаганылт
     ла̄тыӈ+N+Du+Lat+PxPl3: ла̄тӈаганылн
     ла̄тыӈ+N+Du+Abl+PxPl3: ла̄тӈаганылныл
     ла̄тыӈ+N+Du+Ins+PxPl3: ла̄тӈаганылтыл

     ла̄тыӈ+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl3: [ла̄тӈаныл, ла̄тӈананыл]
     ла̄тыӈ+N+Pl+Loc+PxPl3: [ла̄тӈанылт, ла̄тӈананылт]
     ла̄тыӈ+N+Pl+Lat+PxPl3: [ла̄тӈанылн, ла̄тӈананылн]
     ла̄тыӈ+N+Pl+Abl+PxPl3: [ла̄тӈанылныл, ла̄тӈананылныл]
     ла̄тыӈ+N+Pl+Ins+PxPl3: [ла̄тӈанылтыл, ла̄тӈананылтыл]
     
